Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 5. Management of Fish and Fisheries.

Sec. 16.05.730.
Management of wild and enhanced stocks of fish.

Fish stocks in the state shall be managed consistent with sustained yield of wild fish stocks and may be managed consistent with sustained yield of enhanced fish stocks.

In allocating enhanced fish stocks, the board shall consider the need of fish enhancement projects to obtain brood stock. The board may direct the department to manage fisheries in the state to achieve an adequate return of fish from enhanced stocks to enhancement projects for brood stock; however, management to achieve an adequate return of fish to enhancement projects for brood stock shall be consistent with sustained yield of wild fish stocks.

The board may consider the need of enhancement projects authorized under AS

16.10.400

and contractors who operate state-owned enhancement projects under AS

16.10.480

to harvest and sell fish produced by the enhancement project that are not needed for brood stock to obtain funds for the purposes allowed under AS

16.10.450

or

16.10.480

(d). The board may exercise its authority under this title as it considers necessary to direct the department to provide a reasonable harvest of fish, in addition to the fish needed for brood stock, to an enhancement project to obtain funds for the enhancement project if the harvest is consistent with sustained yield of wild fish stocks. The board may adopt a fishery management plan to provide fish to an enhancement project to obtain funds for the purposes allowed under AS

16.10.450

or

16.10.480(d)

.

In this section, “enhancement project” means a project, facility, or hatchery for the enhancement of fishery resources of the state for which the department has issued a permit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 21, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 33, art. 3.

Sec. 16.05.733.
Fish health inspections.

Fish health inspections determined to be necessary by the department shall be performed by a professional fish health specialist certified by the fish health section of the American Fisheries Society.

History.

(§ 3 ch 110 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

16.05.868

.
Renumbered in 2008.

Sec. 16.05.735.
Management of offshore fisheries.

The state may assume management of a fishery in offshore water adjacent to the state in the absence of a federal fishery management plan for the fishery or in the event that a federal fishery management plan for the fishery delegates authority to the state to manage the fishery in the United States exclusive economic zone.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 137 SLA 2002)